Illinois, session 104th, HB3803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by adding 5Section 14.5 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/14.5 new)7    Sec. 14.5. Glyphosate prohibition.8    (a) No person shall distribute, sell, offer for sale, or 9use glyphosate or any products containing glyphosate within 10this State.11    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "glyphosate" means a 12synthetic compound that is a non-selective systemic herbicide, 13also known as N-(phosphonomethyl)glycine with a chemical 14formula of C3H8NO5P.15    (c) The Department of Agriculture may adopt any rules it 16deems necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.